South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 101, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-101-700.  (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Employee" means any individual employed by an institution of higher education on a full-time, part-time, temporary, or contractual basis. (2) "Business with which he is associated" means any business, trade, profession, membership, appointment, elected position or other commercial activity conducted for compensation by an employee other than the employee's official duties with the institution. (B) Every public institution of higher learning, as defined in Section 59-103-5, shall establish and maintain a secure, electronic reporting system for each employee to annually disclose any business with which he is associated. (C) On or before December thirty-first of each year, every employee shall submit a disclosure through the reporting system listing: (1) any business with which he is associated; (2) the name of the business; and (3) a general description of the type of work or services performed for the business. (D) Each institution shall ensure that the reporting system maintains the confidentiality and security of all submitted information. (E) An institution shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to implement and enforce the requirements of this section, including provisions addressing noncompliance. A copy of those policies and procedures shall be provided to the Chairman of the House Education and Public Works Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Education Committee upon adoption and upon any subsequent amendments. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an employee from engaging in any outside business activities unless otherwise restricted by state law or institutional policy. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----